Utah statutes.
61-2c-505.   Court determination and order.
If the court determines that a claim should be levied against the portion of
the fund allocated to carry out the provisions of this chapter, the court
shall enter an order requiring the division to pay from the fund the portion
of the petitioner's judgment that is payable from the fund under Section
61-2c-503.
